New Jersey, session 221, A1349.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No person working at, volunteering at, or attending a youth camp shall be required to wear a mask while present on the premises of the youth camp. b.    Nothing in subsection a. of this section shall be construed to prohibit any person from voluntarily wearing a mask while present on the premises of a youth camp. c.     As used in this act, youth camp means the same as that term is defined by section 3 of P.L.1973, c.375 (C.26:12-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire December 31, 2022.